test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ciepas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čiepâs: # 2A d -k, p > p'p
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čiepˊpâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čiepˊpâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čiepˊpâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čiepˊpâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čieˊpâsin, čiepˊpâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čieˊpâsid, čiepˊpâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čiepˊpâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čiepˊpâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čiepˊpásijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čiepˊpâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čiepˊpâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: čiepˊpâsijguin
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čiepˊpâsijttáá
